Florida, session 2026, HB953.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 488.09, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
488.09 Interagency agreements with tax collectors.—The
Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may enter into
interagency agreements with tax collectors authorizing such tax
collectors to enforce this chapter. An interagency agreement
entered into under this section is a delegation of the authority
of the department to the tax collector. Such an interagency
agreement may include, but need not be limited to, grants of
authority to the tax collector, or his or her agent, to do any
of the following:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb953-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 953 2026
(1) Prohibit licensees operating commercial driving
schools, and their agents, from entering upon the tax
collector's premises, including its parking areas, unless such
licensees and agents are seeking tax collector services in their
personal capacities.
(2) Prohibit any course of conduct by licensees operating
commercial driving schools, and their agents, which operates or
would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a person, the
department, or the tax collector.
(3) Prohibit any transaction, practice, or course of
business related to a commercial driving school which undermines
the integrity of the driver license issuance process.
(4) Require persons licensed to operate commercial driving
schools, and their agents, to present pertinent licenses, agent
identification cards, and certificates issued under this chapter
upon demand of a law enforcement officer, a department employee,
or an employee of the tax collector.
(5) Enter the premises where a commercial driving school
is located to ensure compliance with state and local laws
regulating the business of commercial driving schools.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb953-00